Nebraska, session 109, LB1258.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-2-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
Section 1. It is the intent of the Legislature through enactment of
the Livestock Protection Act to, no later than September 1, 2026:
(1) Create the Division of Brand Registration, Brand Inspection, and
Livestock Theft Investigation under the Department of Agriculture;
(2) Provide for the registration of brands and the renewal of such
registration;
(3) Provide for statewide voluntary brand inspections, as proof of
ownership, upon request for a fee;
(4) Allow producers to use their registered brands to brand their
cattle;
(5) Provide for statewide uniformity of livestock protection;
(6) Protect and strengthen Nebraska's livestock industry and
competitiveness;
(7) Provide for an advisory committee to provide feedback to the
division. Such committee may consist of representatives from the
livestock industry; and
(8) Provide for the adoption and promulgation of rules and
regulations relating to livestock protection.
Sec. 2. Section 11-201, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
11-201 It shall be the duty of the Risk Manager:
(1) To prescribe the amount, terms, and conditions of any bond or
equivalent commercial insurance when the amount or terms are not fixed by
any specific statute. The Risk Manager, in prescribing the amount,
deductibles, conditions, and terms, shall consider the type of risks, the
relationship of the premium to risks involved, the past and projected
trends for premiums, the ability of the Tort Claims Fund, the State Self-
Insured Property Fund, and state agencies to pay the deductibles, and any
other factors the manager may, in his or her discretion, deem necessary
in order to accomplish the provisions of sections 2-1201, 3-103, 8-104,
8-105, 9-807, 11-119, 11-121, 11-201, 11-202, 37-110, 48-158, 48-609,
-3-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
48-618, 48-804.03, 53-109, 54-191, 55-123, 55-126, 55-127, 55-150,
57-917, 60-1303, 60-1502, 71-222.01, 72-1241, 77-366, 80-401.02, 81-111,
81-151, 81-5,167, 81-8,128, 81-8,141, 81-1108.14, 81-2002, 83-128,
84-106, 84-206, and 84-801;
(2) To pass upon the sufficiency of and approve the surety on the
bonds or equivalent commercial insurance of all officers and employees of
the state, when approval is not otherwise prescribed by any specific
statute;
(3) To arrange for the writing of corporate surety bonds or
equivalent commercial insurance for all the officers and employees of the
state who are required by statute to furnish bonds;
(4) To arrange for the writing of the blanket corporate surety bond
or equivalent commercial insurance required by this section; and
(5) To order the payment of corporate surety bond or equivalent
commercial insurance premiums out of the State Insurance Fund created by
section 81-8,239.02.
All state employees not specifically required to give bond by
section 11-119 shall be bonded under a blanket corporate surety bond or
insured under equivalent commercial insurance for faithful performance
and honesty in an amount determined by the Risk Manager.
The Risk Manager may separately bond any officer, employee, or group
thereof under a separate corporate surety bond or equivalent commercial
insurance policy for performance and honesty pursuant to the standards
set forth in subdivision (1) of this section if the corporate surety or
commercial insurer will not bond or insure or excludes from coverage any
officer, employee, or group thereof under the blanket bond or commercial
insurance required by this section, or if the Risk Manager finds that the
reasonable availability or cost of the blanket bond or commercial
insurance required under this section is adversely affected by any of the
following factors: The loss experience, types of risks to be bonded or
insured, relationship of premium to risks involved, past and projected
-4-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
trends for premiums, or any other factors.
Surety bonds of collection agencies, as required by section 45-608,
and detective agencies, as required by section 71-3207, shall be approved
by the Secretary of State. The Attorney General shall approve all bond
forms distributed by the Secretary of State.
Sec. 3. Section 54-170, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-170 Sections 54-170 to 54-1,131 and sections 1, 8 to 10, 12, 14,
15, and 39 to 43 of this act shall be known and may be cited as the
Livestock Protection Brand Act.
Sec. 4. Section 54-171, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-171 For purposes of the Livestock Protection Brand Act, the
definitions found in sections 54-171.01 to 54-190 and sections 8 to 10,
12, and 14 of this act shall be used.
Sec. 5. Section 54-172, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-172 Bill of sale means a formal instrument for the conveyance or
transfer of title to livestock or other goods and chattels. The bill of
sale shall state the purchaser's name and address, the date of transfer,
the guarantee of title, the number of livestock transferred, the sex of
such livestock, the brand or brands, the location of the brand or brands
or a statement to the effect that the animal is unbranded, any approved
nonvisual identifiers, and the name and address of the seller. The
signature of the seller shall be attested by at least one witness or
acknowledged by a notary public or by some other officer authorized by
state law to take acknowledgments. For any conveyance or transfer of
title to cattle subject to assessment imposed pursuant to the federal
Beef Promotion and Research Order, 7 C.F.R. part 1260, for which the
purchaser is the collecting person pursuant to 7 C.F.R. 1260.311 for
purposes of collecting and remitting such assessment, the bill of sale
-5-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
shall include a notation of the amount the purchaser collected from the
seller or deducted from the sale proceeds for the assessment. A properly
executed bill of sale means a bill of sale that is provided by the seller
and received by the purchaser.
Sec. 6. Section 54-176, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-176 Brand inspector means a person employed by, or a contracted
service provider retained by, the department the Nebraska Brand
Committee, or some other brand inspection agency, inside or outside of
the State of Nebraska, for the purpose of identifying brands, marks, or
other identifying characteristics of livestock or approved nonvisual
identifiers to determine the existence of such brands, marks, or
identifying characteristics or identifiers and from such determinations
in conjunction with any documentation or other satisfactory evidence of
ownership attempt to establish correct and true ownership of such
livestock, and generally carry out the provisions and enforcement of all
laws pertaining to brands, brand inspection, physical inspection,
electronic inspection, and associated livestock laws.
Sec. 7. Section 54-179, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-179 Certificate of inspection means the official document issued
and signed by a brand inspector attesting to the true ownership of
livestock as determined by the inspector and any authorizing (1) movement
of livestock from a point of origin within the brand inspection area to a
destination either inside or outside of the brand inspection area or
outside of this state, (2) slaughter of livestock as specified on such
certificate, or (3) the change of ownership of livestock as specified on
such certificate. A certificate of inspection shall designate, as needed,
the name of the shipper, consignor, or seller of the livestock, the
purchaser or consignee of the livestock, the destination of the
livestock, the vehicle license number or carrier number, the miles driven
-6-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
by an inspector to perform inspection, the amount of inspection fees
collected, the number and sex of the livestock to be moved or
slaughtered, any brands on the livestock, any approved nonvisual
identifiers, and the brand owner. A certificate of inspection shall be
construed and is intended to be documentary evidence of ownership on all
livestock covered by such document.
Sec. 8. Department means the Department of Agriculture.
Sec. 9. Director means the Director of Agriculture.
Sec. 10. Division means the Division of Brand Registration, Brand
Inspection, and Livestock Theft Investigation established pursuant to
section 15 of this act.
Sec. 11. Section 54-180, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-180 Estray means any livestock found running at large upon public
or private lands, either fenced or unfenced, whose owner is unknown in
the area where found, any such livestock which is branded with a brand
which is not on record in the office of the brand recorder Nebraska Brand
Committee, or any livestock for which ownership has not been established
as provided in section 54-1,118.
Sec. 12. Section 54-187.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-187.01 Inspection Physical inspection means an inspection for
purposes of the Livestock Protection Brand Act performed by a brand
inspector an employee of the Nebraska Brand Committee physically present
at the location of the inspected animals to verify ownership through
visual observation of brands or other distinguishing markings and
physical characteristics of the livestock and examination of any
associated documentary or other evidence of ownership.
Sec. 13. Section 54-182, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-182 Investigator means an employee of the department Nebraska
-7-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
Brand Committee who is also a deputy state sheriff and has the duty,
responsibility, and authority to enforce all state statutes pertaining to
brands, brand inspection, physical inspection, electronic inspection, and
associated livestock laws and to investigate independently or in
conjunction with other state or local law enforcement agencies instances
of unlawful taking or disposition of livestock or any other crime
involving fraud or deception pertaining to livestock or the ownership,
sale, transport, and possession of livestock. An investigator is also
responsible for the investigation of all problems associated with brands,
brand inspection, and associated livestock enforcement problems. An
investigator shall also be available for assignment by the department to
any investigation and enforcement activities under animal health
authorities assigned to the department.
Sec. 14. Section 54-171.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-171.01 Nonvisual Approved nonvisual identifier means a nonvisual
method of livestock identification, including approved by the Nebraska
Brand Committee such as an electronic device, a nose print, a retinal
scan, a DNA match, or any other such nonvisual method of livestock
identification.
Sec. 15. (1) The Division of Brand Registration, Brand Inspection,
and Livestock Theft Investigation is established in the department. The
purpose of the division is to protect brand and livestock owners in this
state from the theft of livestock through established brand recording,
the availability of brand inspection services, and livestock theft
investigation.
(2) The director shall appoint a brand recorder who shall be the
administrative head of the division. The brand recorder shall:
(a) Be responsible for the receipt and processing of applications
for new livestock brands, the issuance of brand registration
certificates, the transfer of ownership of existing livestock brands, and
-8-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
the maintenance of accurate and permanent records relating to livestock
brands;
(b) With the approval of the director, for the purpose of carrying
out the Livestock Protection Act:
(i) Hire brand inspectors, investigators, and assistants;
(ii) Enter a contract with a service provider; and
(iii) Enter an agreement with a state or local governmental agency;
(c) Establish qualifications for employees of the division or for
contracts or agreements that are made by the division for the provision
of brand inspection services;
(d) Develop and provide any training material or program related to
the provision of brand inspection services;
(e) Be the point of contact for requests for brand inspection;
(f) Assign a brand inspector to provide inspection services and to
issue a brand inspection certificate on behalf of the division;
(g) Be the point of contact for reports of missing or stolen
livestock and reports of fraud or deception pertaining to livestock or
the ownership, sale, transport, and possession of livestock;
(h) Assign an investigator to investigate the reports described in
subdivision (g) of this subsection;
(i) Cooperate and coordinate with the Attorney General, the Nebraska
State Patrol, and any other state or local law enforcement agency in the
investigation of instances of unlawful taking or disposition of livestock
or any other crime involving fraud or deception pertaining to livestock
or the ownership, sale, transport, and possession of livestock;
(j) Advise the director regarding any memorandum of understanding or
contractual arrangement with the Attorney General, the Nebraska State
Patrol, and any other state or local agency regarding specialized
training of investigators employed by the division;
(k) Assess and collect fees and charges for brand inspection
services, brand registration, transfer of brands, and brand
-9-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
documentation, and related fees and charges under the Livestock
Protection Act; and
(l) Recommend to the director any revision of rules and regulations
adopted and promulgated under the Livestock Protection Act.
Sec. 16. Section 54-193, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-193 The brand recorder Nebraska Brand Committee shall
periodically have published in book form, electronic medium, or any such
other method prescribed by the committee a list of all brands recorded
with the division brand committee at the time of such publication. Such
publication may be supplemented from time to time. The publication shall
contain a facsimile of all recorded brands, together with the owner's
name and post office address, and shall be arranged in convenient form
for reference. The brand recorder committee shall send, without any
charge, the publication as required by section 51-413 to the Nebraska
Publications Clearinghouse and shall provide the publication to each
inspector of record and to the county sheriff of each county in the State
of Nebraska, which shall be kept as a matter of public record. The
publication may be sold to the general public for a price equal to or
less than the actual cost of production.
Sec. 17. Section 54-194, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-194 The brand recorder may director of the Nebraska Brand
Committee or the chairperson of the brand committee shall have the
authority to sign all certificates and other documents that may by law
require certification by signature. Such documents shall include, but not
be limited to, new brand certificates, brand transfer certificates,
duplicate brand certificates, and brand renewal receipts. A facsimile of
the department brand committee seal and the signature of the brand
recorder shall also be placed on all brand certificates.
Sec. 18. Section 54-196, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-10-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
amended to read:
54-196 The department Nebraska Brand Committee may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Livestock Protection
Brand Act and section 54-415.
Sec. 19. Section 54-197, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-197 The Nebraska Brand Inspection and Theft Prevention Fund is
created. Fees and money collected pursuant to the Livestock Protection
Brand Act not otherwise provided for in the act shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer for credit to the fund. The fund shall be used by the
department Nebraska Brand Committee in the administration and enforcement
of the act and section 54-415. All expenses and salaries provided for
under such act or incurred by reason thereof shall be paid out of the
fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 20. Section 54-198, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-198 (1) Any person may record a brand, which he or she has the
exclusive right to use in this state, and it is unlawful to use any brand
for branding any livestock unless the person using such brand has
recorded that brand with the brand recorder Nebraska Brand Committee. A
brand is a mark consisting of symbols, characters, numerals, or a
combination of such intended as a visual means of ownership
identification when applied to the hide of an animal. Only a hot iron or
freeze brand or other method approved by the brand recorder brand
committee shall be used to apply a brand to a live animal.
(2) A hot iron brand or freeze brand may be used for in-herd
identification purposes such as for year or production records. With
respect to hot iron brands used for in-herd identification, the numerals
0, 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, and 9 in singular or triangular position are
-11-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
reserved on both the right and left shoulder of all cattle, except that
such shoulder location for a single-number hot iron brand may be used for
year branding for in-herd identification purposes, and an alphabetical
letter may be substituted for one of the numerals used in a triangular
configuration for in-herd identification purposes. Hot iron brands used
for in-herd identification shall be used in conjunction with the recorded
hot iron brand and shall be on the same side of the animal as the
recorded hot iron brand. Freeze branding for in-herd identification may
be applied in any location and any configuration with any combination of
numerals or alphabetical letters.
(3) It shall be unlawful to knowingly maintain a herd containing one
or more animals which the possessor has branded, or caused to be branded,
in violation of this section or any other provision of the Livestock
Protection Brand Act.
Sec. 21. Section 54-199, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-199 (1) To record a brand, a person shall forward to the brand
recorder Nebraska Brand Committee a facsimile or description of the brand
desired to be recorded, a written application, and a recording fee and
research fee established by the department brand committee. Such
recording fee may vary according to the number of locations and methods
of brand requested but shall not be more than one hundred fifty dollars
per application. Such research fee shall be charged on all applications
and shall not be more than fifty dollars per application.
(2) For recording of visual brands, upon receipt of a facsimile of
the brand, an application, and the required fee, the brand recorder
committee shall determine compliance with the following requirements:
(a) The brand shall be an identification mark that is applied to the
hide of a live animal by hot iron branding or by either hot iron branding
or freeze branding. The brand shall be on either side of the animal in
any one of three locations, the shoulder, ribs, or hip;
-12-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
(b) The brand is not recorded under the name of any other person and
does not conflict with or closely resemble a prior recorded brand;
(c) The brand application specifies the left or right side of the
animal and the location on that side of the animal where the brand is to
be placed;
(d) The brand is not recorded as a trade name nor as the name of any
profit or nonprofit corporation, unless such trade name or corporation is
of record, in current good standing, with the Secretary of State; and
(e) The brand is, in the judgment of the brand recorder committee,
legible, adequate, and of such a nature that the brand when applied can
be properly read and identified by employees of the brand committee.
(3) All visual brands shall be recorded as a hot iron brand only
unless a co-recording as a freeze brand or other approved method of
branding is requested by the applicant. The brand recorder committee
shall approve co-recording a brand as a freeze brand unless the brand
would not be distinguishable from in-herd identification applied by
freeze branding.
(4) If the facsimile, the description, or the application does not
comply with the requirements of this section, the brand recorder
committee shall not record such brand as requested but shall return the
recording fee to the forwarding person. The power of examination and
rejection is vested in the brand recorder committee, and if the brand
recorder committee determines that the application for a visual brand
falls within the category set out in subdivision (2)(e) of this section,
it shall decide whether or not a recorded brand shall be issued. The
brand recorder committee shall make such examination as promptly as
possible. If the brand is recorded, the ownership vests from the date of
filing of the application.
(5) The brand committee may by rule and regulation provide for the
use of approved nonvisual identifiers for purposes of enrolling cattle
identified by such method of livestock identification. Such method of
-13-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
livestock identification shall be approved only if it functions as
satisfactory evidence of ownership for the purpose of enrollment of
cattle and for electronic inspection authorized under section 54-1,108.
Before approving any nonvisual identifier, the brand committee shall
consider the degree to which such method may be susceptible to error,
failure, or fraudulent alteration. Any rule or regulation shall be
adopted and promulgated only after public hearing conducted in compliance
with the Administrative Procedure Act.
Sec. 22. Section 54-1,100, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-1,100 (1) A recorded brand is the property of the person causing
such record to be made and is subject to sale, assignment, transfer,
devise, and descent as personal property. Any instrument of writing
evidencing the sale, assignment, or transfer of a recorded brand shall be
effective upon its recording with the brand recorder Nebraska Brand
Committee. No such instrument shall be accepted for recording if the
brand recorder committee has been duly notified of the existence of a
lien or security interest against livestock owned or thereafter acquired
by the owner of such brand by the holder of such lien or security
interest. Written notification from the holder of such lien or security
interest that the lien or security interest has been satisfied or consent
from the holder of such lien or security interest shall be required in
order for the brand recorder committee to accept for recording an
instrument selling, assigning, or transferring such recorded brand.
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the fee for
recording such an instrument shall be established by the brand recorder
committee and shall not be more than forty dollars. Such instrument shall
give notice to all third persons of the matter recorded in the instrument
and shall be acknowledged by a notary public or any other officer
qualified under law to administer oaths.
(2) The owner of a recorded brand may lease the brand to another
-14-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
person upon compliance with this subsection and subject to the approval
of the brand recorder committee. The lessee shall pay a filing fee
established by the brand recorder committee not to exceed one hundred
dollars. The leased recorded brand may expire as agreed in the lease, but
in no event shall such leased recorded brand exceed the original
expiration date.
Sec. 23. Section 54-1,101, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-1,101 (1) The owner of a recorded brand is entitled to one
certified copy of the record of such brand from the brand recorder
Nebraska Brand Committee without charge. Additional certified copies of
the record may be obtained by anyone upon the payment of one dollar for
each copy.
(2) Copies of any other document maintained by the brand recorder of
the brand committee may be requested, and a fee of one dollar shall be
collected for each page copied. Only personnel authorized by the brand
recorder committee shall make copies and collect such fees. The party
requesting the copies is responsible for payment of the fee and shall
reimburse the brand recorder committee for the research time necessary to
furnish the requested documents at a rate of not less than twenty nor
more than forty dollars per hour of research time. The rate shall be
reviewed and set annually by the department brand committee.
Sec. 24. Section 54-1,102, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-1,102 (1) A recorded brand may be applied by its owner until its
expiration date.
(2) The On and after January 1, 1994, the expiration date of a
recorded brand is the last day of the calendar quarter of the renewal
year as designated by the brand recorder Nebraska Brand Committee in the
records of the brand recorder committee.
(3) The brand recorder committee shall notify every owner of a
-15-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
recorded brand of its expiration date at least sixty days prior to the
expiration date, and the owner of the recorded brand shall pay a renewal
fee established by the department brand committee which shall not be more
than two hundred dollars and furnish such other information as may be
required by the brand recorder committee. The renewal fee is due and
payable on or before the expiration date and renews a recorded brand for
a period of four years regardless of the number of locations on one side
of an animal on which the brand is recorded. If any owner fails, refuses,
or neglects to pay the renewal fee by the expiration date, the brand
shall expire and be forfeited.
(4) The brand recorder shall committee has the authority to hold an
expired brand for one year following the date of expiration. An expired
brand may be reinstated by the same owner during such one-year period
upon return of a brand application form and payment of the recording fee
and research fee for such brand established by the department brand
committee under section 54-199 plus a penalty of five dollars for each
month or part of a month which has passed since the date of expiration. A
properly reinstated brand may be transferred to another person during
such one-year period upon completion of a transfer form, with a notarized
bill of sale signed by the prior owner attached to such transfer form.
Sec. 25. Section 54-1,103, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-1,103 (1) Cattle brands consisting of alphabetical letters A
through Z, and numbers 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, and 9 on the left or right
jaw are reserved for assignment by the brand recorder , as designated by
the Nebraska Brand Committee. The brand recorder shall not assign such
brands to any person in the State of Nebraska unless authorized by the
brand committee, and it shall be unlawful for any person to use such
brands except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Every person when spaying heifers, upon request of the owner
thereof, shall brand such heifers with the alphabetical letter O on the
-16-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
left jaw and furnish the owner with a certificate that all heifers so
branded have been properly spayed by a licensed veterinarian. Permission
may be granted by the brand recorder committee to state and federal
animal disease control agencies to require the use of the letters F, V,
B, S, and T and an open-end spade on either the right or left jaw of
cattle in a manner consistent with animal disease control laws.
Sec. 26. Section 54-1,104, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-1,104 There is a recorded brand consisting of the alphabetical
letter N on the entire right and left sides which is assigned to the
division Nebraska Brand Committee to be used only by authorized personnel
of the division brand committee to permanently identify livestock which
are suspected of having been stolen and may be used as evidence in any
court proceeding. It shall in no way signify that the division brand
committee (1) is the owner of livestock so branded or (2) claims
ownership in any livestock carrying such brand. It shall only be
construed and intended that livestock so branded are evidence or portions
of evidence seized relative to an alleged theft of livestock.
Sec. 27. Section 54-1,105, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-1,105 (1) Cattle branded with a Nebraska-recorded visual brand
shall be branded so that the recorded brand of the owner shows
distinctly.
(2) If the owners of recorded brands which conflict with or closely
resemble each other maintain their herds in close proximity to each
other, the brand recorder Nebraska Brand Committee has the authority to
decide, after hearing as to which at least ten days' written notice has
been given, any dispute arising therefrom and to direct such change or
changes in the position or positions where such recorded brand or brands
are to be placed as will remove any confusion that might result from such
conflict or close resemblance.
-17-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
Sec. 28. Section 54-1,108, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-1,108 (1) (1)(a) All physical inspections for brands provided for
in the Livestock Protection Brand Act or section 54-415 shall be from
sunrise to sundown or during such other hours and under such conditions
as the brand recorder Nebraska Brand Committee determines. The division
shall provide inspection services upon the request of any:
(a) Law enforcement agency;
(b) Order of any court of competent jurisdiction;
(c) Bank, credit agency, or lending institution with a legal or
financial interest in the cattle;
(d) Livestock auction market or packing plant requesting such
inspection services;
(e) Party to a transaction involving the transfer of possession or
ownership of livestock; or
(f) Livestock owner who is missing cattle. The brand committee shall
assess a fifty-dollar late notice surcharge if a request for a physical
inspection is made less than forty-eight hours prior to the date of
inspection.
(b) A physical inspection shall be required when brands applied by
hot iron or freeze branding methods are the exclusive means of ownership
identification and in all other cases that do not qualify for electronic
inspection as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(c) Beginning October 1, 2021, a physical inspection fee of eighty-
five cents per head until June 30, 2023, and beginning July 1, 2023, a
fee established by the Nebraska Brand Committee, of not more than one
dollar and ten cents per head shall be charged for all cattle inspected
in accordance with the Livestock Brand Act or section 54-415, inspected
within the brand inspection area or brand inspection service area by
court order, inspected at the request of any bank, credit agency, or
lending institution with a legal or financial interest in such cattle, or
-18-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
inspected at the request of a neighboring livestock owner with missing
cattle. The inspection fee for court-ordered inspections shall be paid
from the proceeds of the sale of such cattle if ordered by the court or
by either party as the court directs. For other inspections, the person
requesting the inspection of such cattle is responsible for the
inspection fee. Brand inspections requested by either a purchaser or
seller of cattle located within the brand inspection service area shall
be provided upon the same terms and charges as brand inspections
performed within the brand inspection area. If estray cattle are
identified as a result of the inspection, such cattle shall be processed
in the manner provided by section 54-415.
(d) The actual mileage incurred by the inspector to perform a
physical inspection shall be paid by the party requesting inspection and
paid at the rate established by the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to section 81-1176.
(2)(a) The department shall establish an inspection fee (e) For
physical inspections performed outside of the brand inspection area that
are not provided for in subdivision (c) of this subsection, the fee shall
be the inspection fee established in such subdivision plus a fee to cover
the actual expense of performing the inspection, including mileage at the
rate established by the Department of Administrative Services and an
hourly rate, not to exceed thirty dollars per hour, for the travel and
inspection time incurred by the department brand committee to perform
such inspection. The division brand committee shall charge and collect
such the actual expense fee. Such fee shall apply to inspections
performed outside the brand inspection area as part of an investigation
into known or alleged violations of the Livestock Protection Brand Act
and shall be charged against the person committing the violation.
(b) Such fee shall be paid:
(i) By the person committing the violation;
(ii) For court-ordered inspections, as directed by the court from
-19-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
the proceeds of the sale of the cattle or any party to the court
proceeding; or
(iii) By the person requesting the inspection of such cattle.
(2)(a) The brand committee may provide for electronic inspection of
enrolled cattle identified by approved nonvisual identifiers pursuant to
subsection (5) of section 54-199. The brand committee shall establish
procedures for enrollment of such cattle with the brand committee which
shall include providing acceptable certification or evidence of
ownership. Electronic inspection shall not require agency employees to be
present, except that random audits shall occur.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2021, an electronic inspection fee not to
exceed eighty-five cents per head until June 30, 2023, and beginning July
1, 2023, a fee established by the brand committee of not more than one
dollar and ten cents per head shall be charged for all cattle subjected
to electronic inspection in accordance with the Livestock Brand Act or
section 54-415.
(c) A certified bill of sale for sale of calves shall be provided to
qualified dairies once the required information is electronically
transferred to the brand committee on calves under thirty days of age.
The fee shall be the same as for an electronic inspection under
subdivision (2)(b) of this section.
(d) A certified transportation permit shall be provided to qualified
dairies after the required information is electronically transferred to
the brand committee on calves under thirty days of age which are moved
out of the inspection area. The fee shall be the same as for an
electronic inspection under subdivision (2)(b) of this section.
(e) On or before December 1, 2021, the brand committee shall report
to the Legislature any actions taken or necessary for implementing
electronic inspection authorized by this subsection, including personnel
and other resources utilized to support electronic inspection, how the
brand committee's information technology capabilities are utilized to
-20-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
support electronic inspection, a listing of approved nonvisual
identifiers, the requirements for enrolling cattle identified by approved
nonvisual identifiers, current and anticipated utilization of electronic
inspection by the livestock industry, and the fees required to recover
costs of performing electronic inspection.
(3) Any person who has reason to believe that cattle were shipped
erroneously due to an inspection error occurred during a brand inspection
may request a reinspection. The person making such request shall be
responsible for the expenses incurred as a result of the reinspection
unless the results of the reinspection substantiate the claim of
inspection error, in which case the division brand committee shall be
responsible for the reinspection expenses.
Sec. 29. Section 54-1,115, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-1,115 (1) Any person, other than the owner or the owner's
employee, using a motor vehicle or trailer to transport livestock or
carcasses over any land within the State of Nebraska not owned or rented
by such person or who is so transporting such livestock upon a highway,
public street, or thoroughfare within the State of Nebraska shall have in
his or her possession a livestock transportation authority form or ,
certificate of inspection , or shipping certificate from a registered
feedlot, authorizing such movement as to each head of livestock
transported by such vehicle.
(2) A livestock transportation authority form shall be in writing
and shall state the name of the owner of the livestock, the owner's post
office address, the place from which the livestock are being moved,
including the name of the ranch, if any, the destination, the name and
address of the carrier, the license number and make of motor vehicle to
which consigned, together with the number of livestock and a description
thereof including kind, sex, breed, color, and marks, if any, and in the
case of livestock shipments originating within the brand inspection area,
-21-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
the brands, if there are any. The authority form shall be signed by the
owner of the livestock or the owner's authorized agent.
(3) Any peace officer, based upon probable cause to question the
ownership of the livestock being transported, may stop a motor vehicle or
motor vehicle and trailer and request exhibition of any authority form or
certificate required by this section.
(4) A violation of this section is an infraction. A peace officer
shall have the authority to write a citation, which shall be waivable, to
offenders in violation of this section. A fine under this section shall
not exceed two hundred dollars per head for each offense. Violations
shall be charged in the county in which the offense occurred.
Sec. 30. Section 54-1,116, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-1,116 (1) All livestock sold or otherwise disposed of shall be
accompanied by a properly executed bill of sale in writing, satisfactory
evidence of ownership, or , for cattle, a certificate of inspection. All
owners of or persons possessing livestock have a duty to exhibit, upon
request of any person, the bill of sale or other satisfactory evidence of
ownership of the livestock.
(2) A violation of this section is an infraction. A peace officer
shall have the authority to write a citation, which shall be waivable, to
offenders in violation of this section. A fine under this section shall
not exceed two hundred dollars per head for each offense. Violations
shall be charged in the county in which the offense occurred.
Sec. 31. Section 54-1,118, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-1,118 If any livestock inspected under the Livestock Protection
Brand Act or section 54-415 is unbranded or bears a brand or brands in
addition to, or other than, the recorded brand or brands of the shipper
or seller, then the shipper or seller may be required to establish his or
her ownership of such livestock by exhibiting to the brand inspector
-22-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
Nebraska Brand Committee a bill of sale to such livestock or by other
satisfactory evidence of ownership. If ownership of the livestock is not
established:
(1) Such livestock shall be considered an estray;
(2) The department shall notify the county sheriff of the county in
which such livestock is inspected or is located; and
(3) Such livestock shall be disposed of pursuant to section
54-415. , the livestock may be sold, and the selling agent who sells such
livestock shall hold the proceeds of the sale. If any shipper or seller
who has offered such livestock for sale refuses to accept the bids
offered, ownership must be established, or a cash bond posted with the
selling agent in an amount equal to the approximate value of the
livestock and payable to the brand committee, before such livestock may
be removed from the premises. When ownership has been established the
cash bond shall be returned to the person who or which posted it.
The shipper or seller of the livestock is required to establish
ownership of such livestock within sixty days after its sale. If such
shipper or seller establishes ownership of such livestock, the Nebraska
Brand Committee shall order the selling agent of such livestock to pay
the proceeds of sale to the shipper or seller. If such shipper or seller
fails to establish ownership within the sixty days, such livestock shall
be considered an estray and the Nebraska Brand Committee shall order the
selling agent to pay the proceeds of sale over to the brand committee.
All funds that the brand committee receives from the sale of any estray
shall be placed in a separate custodial fund known as the estray fund.
The brand committee shall determine the ownership of estrays that
originate within the brand inspection area. Such funds shall be disposed
of in the manner provided in section 54-415.
Sec. 32. Section 54-1,124.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
54-1,124.01 A person commits a Class III felony if:
-23-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
(1) Such person willfully and knowingly performs or causes to be
performed any act to:
(a) Apply, remove, damage, or alter a an approved nonvisual
identifier; or
(b) Expunge, alter, render inaccessible, or otherwise corrupt
information recorded or embedded on or in a an approved nonvisual
identifier; and
(2) Such conduct is done with the intent to deprive an owner of
livestock or falsely assert ownership of livestock.
Sec. 33. Section 54-1,125, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-1,125 (1) Any person who offers as evidence of ownership for any
livestock sold, traded, or otherwise disposed of as provided in the
Livestock Protection Brand Act or section 54-415, any forged, altered, or
otherwise falsely prepared document or form, knowing the same to be
forged, altered, or otherwise falsely prepared, is guilty of the Class IV
felony of criminal possession of a forged instrument as defined in
section 28-604.
(2) Any person who forges, alters, or otherwise changes in any
manner any of the forms or documents which are satisfactory evidence of
ownership or any other form or document required by or provided for in
the Livestock Protection Brand Act or section 54-415, is guilty of second
degree forgery as defined in section 28-603, and shall be punished in
accordance with such section.
(3) Any person who knowingly misrepresents or misuses any
certificate of inspection or other satisfactory evidence of ownership is
guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.
Sec. 34. Section 54-1,126, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-1,126 Any person who violates any provision of the Livestock
Protection Brand Act is guilty of a Class II misdemeanor unless another
-24-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
penalty is specifically provided for such violation.
Sec. 35. Section 54-1,127, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-1,127 Whenever any person is arrested for a violation of the
Livestock Protection Brand Act or section 54-415 punishable as a
misdemeanor, the arresting peace officer shall, except as otherwise
provided in this section, take the name and address of such person and
the license number of his or her motor vehicle. The peace officer shall
issue a summons or otherwise notify him or her in writing to appear at a
time and place to be specified in such summons or notice. Such time shall
be at least five days after such arrest, unless the person arrested
demands an earlier hearing. Such person, if he or she so desires, has a
right to an immediate hearing or a hearing within twenty-four hours at a
convenient hour, such hearing to be before a magistrate within the county
where such offense was committed. The peace officer shall thereupon, and
upon the giving by such person of his or her written promise to appear at
such time and place, forthwith release him or her from custody. Any
person refusing to give such written promise to appear shall be taken
immediately by the arresting peace officer before the nearest or most
accessible magistrate.
Sec. 36. Section 54-1,128, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-1,128 (1) An owner may brand cattle with a brand recorded or
registered in another state when:
(a) Cattle are purchased at a livestock auction market licensed
under the Livestock Auction Market Act or congregated at another location
approved by the brand recorder Nebraska Brand Committee;
(b) The cattle will be imminently exported from Nebraska;
(c) The cattle are branded at the livestock auction market or other
approved location; and
(d) An out-of-state brand permit has been obtained prior to branding
-25-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
the cattle.
(2) An application for an out-of-state brand permit shall be made to
the brand recorder a brand inspector and shall include a description of
the brand, a written application, and a fee not to exceed fifty dollars
as determined by the department. The brand recorder Nebraska Brand
Committee. A brand inspector shall evaluate and may approve an out-of-
state brand permit within a reasonable period of time.
(3) Cattle branded under an out-of-state brand permit shall remain
subject to all other brand inspection requirements under the Livestock
Brand Act.
(4) A violation of this section is an infraction. A peace officer
shall have the authority to write a citation, which shall be waivable, to
offenders in violation of this section. A fine under this section shall
not exceed two hundred dollars per head for each offense. Violations
shall be charged in the county in which the offense occurred.
Sec. 37. Section 54-1,129, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-1,129 The owner or operator of any livestock auction market, as
defined in section 54-1158, or packing plant located in any county
outside the brand inspection area may voluntarily elect to provide brand
inspection for all cattle brought to such livestock auction market or
packing plant from within the brand inspection area upon compliance with
sections 54-1,129 to 54-1,131.
Sec. 38. Section 54-1,131, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-1,131 Inspection provided for in sections 54-1,129 to 54-1,131
shall be conducted in the manner established by the Livestock Protection
Brand Act. The owner or operator making such election may be required to
guarantee to the brand recorder Nebraska Brand Committee that inspection
fees derived from such livestock auction market or packing plant will be
sufficient, in each twelve-month period, to pay the per diem and mileage
-26-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
of the inspectors required and that he or she will reimburse the
department committee for any deficit incurred in any such twelve-month
period. Such guarantee shall be secured by a corporate surety bond, to be
approved by the Secretary of State, in a penal sum to be established by
the department Nebraska Brand Committee.
Sec. 39. On and after January 1, 2027, positions of employment in
the Nebraska Brand Committee related to the powers, duties, and functions
transferred to the department pursuant to this legislative bill are
transferred to the department. For purposes of the transition, employees
of the Nebraska Brand Committee shall be considered employees of the
department and shall retain their rights under the state personnel system
or pertinent bargaining agreement, and their service shall be deemed
continuous. This section does not grant any employee any new right or
benefit that is not otherwise provided by law or bargaining agreement or
preclude the department or the director from exercising any of the
prerogatives of management set forth in section 81-1311 or as otherwise
provided by law. This section is not an amendment to or a substitute for
the provisions of any existing bargaining agreement.
Sec. 40. On January 1, 2027, any appropriation and salary limit
provided in any legislative bill enacted by the One Hundred Ninth
Legislature to Agency No. 39, Nebraska Brand Committee, shall be null and
void, and any such amounts are hereby appropriated to Agency No. 18,
Department of Agriculture: Program No. 75, Division of Brand
Registration, Brand Inspection, and Livestock Theft Investigation. Any
financial obligations of the Nebraska Brand Committee that remain unpaid
as of January 1, 2027, and that are subsequently certified as valid
encumbrances to the accounting division of the Department of
Administrative Services pursuant to sections 81-138.01 to 81-138.04,
shall be paid by the Department of Agriculture from the unexpended
balance of the appropriation to the Division of Brand Registration, Brand
Inspection, and Livestock Theft Investigation of the Department of
-27-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
Agriculture on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 41. On and after January 1, 2027, whenever the Nebraska Brand
Committee is referred to or designated by any contract or other document
in connection with the duties and functions of the department, such
reference or designation shall apply to the department. All contracts
entered into by the Nebraska Brand Committee prior to January 1, 2027, in
connection with the duties and functions of the Nebraska Brand Committee
that are transferred by this legislative bill are hereby recognized, with
the department succeeding to all rights and obligations under such
contracts. Any cash funds, custodial funds, gifts, trusts, grants, and
appropriations of funds from prior fiscal years available to satisfy
obligations incurred under such contracts shall be transferred and
appropriated to such department for the payments of such obligations. All
documents and records transferred, or copies of the same, may be
authenticated or certified by such department for all legal purposes.
Sec. 42. (1) No suit, action, or other proceeding, judicial or
administrative, lawfully commenced prior to January 1, 2027, or that
could have been commenced prior to such date, by or against the Nebraska
Brand Committee, or an employee or agent of the Nebraska Brand Committee
in such employee's or agent's official capacity or in relation to the
discharge of his or her official duties, shall abate by reason of the
transfer of duties and functions from the Nebraska Brand Committee to the
department.
(2) Any suit, action, or other proceeding, judicial or
administrative, that was lawfully commenced prior to January 1, 2027,
under the Livestock Brand Act shall be subject to the provisions of the
act as they existed prior to such date.
Sec. 43. (1) On and after January 1, 2027, unless otherwise
specified, whenever any provision of law refers to the Nebraska Brand
Committee in connection with duties and functions of the Department of
Agriculture, such law shall be construed as referring to the Department
-28-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
of Agriculture.
(2) All rules and regulations adopted and promulgated prior to
January 1, 2027, under the Livestock Protection Act shall continue to be
effective to the extent that such rules and regulations do not conflict
with the changes made by this legislative bill.
(3) All certificates or other forms of approval issued in accordance
with the Livestock Protection Act prior to January 1, 2027, shall remain
valid as issued for purposes of the changes made by this legislative bill
unless revoked or otherwise terminated by law.
Sec. 44. Section 54-415, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-415 (1) Any person taking up an estray in this state within the
brand inspection area or brand inspection service area shall report the
same within seven days thereafter to the Nebraska Brand Committee. Any
person taking up an estray in any other area of the state shall report
such estray the same to the county sheriff of the county where the estray
was taken. If the animal is determined to be an estray by a
representative of the Nebraska Brand Committee or the county sheriff, as
the case may be, such animal shall, as promptly as may be practicable, be
sold through the most convenient livestock auction market. The proceeds
of such sale, after deducting the selling expenses, shall be paid over to
the Nebraska Brand Committee to be placed in the estray fund identified
in section 54-1,118, if such estray was taken up within the brand
inspection area or brand inspection service area, and otherwise to the
treasurer of the county in which such estray was taken up.
(2) During the time such proceeds are impounded, any person taking
up such estray may file a claim with the Nebraska Brand Committee or the
county treasurer , as the case may be, for the expense of feeding and
keeping such estray while in his or her possession. When such claim is
filed, it shall be the duty of the Nebraska Brand Committee or the county
board shall , as the case may be, to decide on the validity of the claim
-29-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
so filed and allow the claim for such amount as may be deemed equitable.
(3) If When the estray is taken up within the brand inspection area
or brand inspection service area, such proceeds shall be impounded for
one year, unless ownership is determined sooner by the Nebraska Brand
Committee, and if ownership is not determined within such one-year
period, the proceeds shall be paid into the permanent school fund, less
the actual expenses incurred in the investigation and processing of the
estray fund. Any amount deducted as actual expenses incurred shall be
deposited in the Nebraska Brand Inspection and Theft Prevention Fund.
When the estray is taken up outside the brand inspection area or brand
inspection service area and ownership of the estray cannot be determined
by the county board, the county board shall then order payment of the
balance of the sale proceeds, less expenses, to the permanent school
fund.
(4) If the brand committee or the county board determines ownership
of an estray sold in accordance with this section by means of evidence of
ownership other than the owner's recorded Nebraska brand, an amount not
to exceed the actual investigative costs or expenses may be deducted from
the proceeds of the sale.
(5) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a Class II
misdemeanor.
(6) The definitions found in the Livestock Protection Act sections
54-171.01 to 54-190 apply to this section.
Sec. 45. Section 54-1160.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
54-1160.01 The owner or operator of any livestock auction market
located in any county outside the brand inspection area created in
section 54-1,109 may voluntarily elect to provide brand inspection as
provided in sections 54-1,129 to 54-1,131.
Sec. 46. Section 60-3,135, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-30-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
60-3,135 (1)(a) Undercover license plates may be issued to federal,
state, county, city, or village law enforcement agencies and shall be
used only for legitimate criminal investigatory purposes. Undercover
license plates may also be issued to the Nebraska State Patrol, the Game
and Parks Commission, deputy state sheriffs employed under the Livestock
Protection Act for state law enforcement purposes, deputy state sheriffs
employed by the Nebraska Brand Committee and State Fire Marshal for state
law enforcement purposes, persons employed by the Tax Commissioner for
state revenue enforcement purposes, the Department of Health and Human
Services for the purposes of communicable disease control, the prevention
and control of those communicable diseases which endanger the public
health, the enforcement of drug control laws, or other investigation
purposes, the Department of Agriculture for special investigative
purposes, and the Insurance Fraud Prevention Division of the Department
of Insurance for investigative purposes. Undercover license plates shall
not be used on personally owned vehicles or for personal use of
government-owned vehicles.
(b) The director shall prescribe a form for agencies to apply for
undercover license plates. The form shall include a space for the name
and signature of the contact person for the requesting agency, a
statement that the undercover license plates are to be used only for
legitimate criminal investigatory purposes, and a statement that
undercover license plates are not to be used on personally owned vehicles
or for personal use of government-owned vehicles.
(2) The agency shall include the name and signature of the contact
person for the agency on the form and pay the fee prescribed in section
60-3,102. If the undercover license plates will be used for the
investigation of a specific event rather than for ongoing investigations,
the agency shall designate on the form an estimate of the length of time
the undercover license plates will be needed. The contact person in the
agency shall sign the form and verify the information contained in the
-31-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
form.
(3) Upon receipt of a completed form, the director shall determine
whether the undercover license plates will be used by an approved agency
for a legitimate purpose pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. If
the director determines that the undercover license plates will be used
for such a purpose, he or she may issue the undercover license plates in
the form and under the conditions he or she determines to be necessary.
The decision of the director regarding issuance of undercover license
plates is final.
(4) The department shall keep records pertaining to undercover
license plates confidential, and such records shall not be subject to
public disclosure.
(5) The contact person shall return the undercover license plates to
the department if:
(a) The undercover license plates expire and are not renewed;
(b) The purpose for which the undercover license plates were issued
has been completed or terminated; or
(c) The director requests their return.
(6) A state agency, board, or commission that uses motor vehicles
from the transportation services bureau of the Department of
Administrative Services shall notify the bureau immediately after
undercover license plates have been assigned to the motor vehicle and
shall provide the equipment and license plate number and the undercover
license plate number to the bureau. The transportation services bureau
shall maintain a list of state-owned motor vehicles which have been
assigned undercover license plates. The list shall be confidential and
not be subject to public disclosure.
(7) The contact person shall be held accountable to keep proper
records of the number of undercover plates possessed by the agency, the
particular license plate numbers for each motor vehicle, and the person
who is assigned to the motor vehicle. This record shall be confidential
-32-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
and not be subject to public disclosure.
Sec. 47. Section 60-480.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-480.01 (1)(a) Undercover drivers' licenses may be issued to
federal, state, county, city, or village law enforcement agencies and
shall be used only for legitimate criminal investigatory purposes.
Undercover drivers' licenses may also be issued to the Nebraska State
Patrol, the Game and Parks Commission, deputy state sheriffs employed
under the Livestock Protection Act for state law enforcement purposes,
deputy state sheriffs employed by the Nebraska Brand Committee and State
Fire Marshal for state law enforcement purposes, persons employed by the
Tax Commissioner for state revenue enforcement purposes, the Department
of Health and Human Services for the purposes of communicable disease
control, the prevention and control of those communicable diseases which
endanger the public health, the enforcement of drug control laws, or
other investigation purposes, the Department of Agriculture for special
investigative purposes, and the Insurance Fraud Prevention Division of
the Department of Insurance for investigative purposes. Undercover
drivers' licenses are not for personal use.
(b) The director shall prescribe a form for agencies to apply for
undercover drivers' licenses. The form shall include a space for the name
and signature of the contact person for the requesting agency, a
statement that the undercover drivers' licenses are to be used only for
legitimate criminal investigatory purposes, and a statement that
undercover drivers' licenses are not for personal use.
(2) The agency shall include the name and signature of the contact
person for the agency on the form and pay the fees prescribed in section
60-4,115. If the undercover drivers' licenses will be used for the
investigation of a specific event rather than for ongoing investigations,
the agency shall designate on the form an estimate of the length of time
the undercover drivers' licenses will be needed. The contact person in
-33-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
the agency shall sign the form and verify the information contained in
the form.
(3) Upon receipt of a completed form, the director shall determine
whether the undercover drivers' licenses will be used by an approved
agency for a legitimate purpose pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section. If the director determines that the undercover drivers' licenses
will be used for such a purpose, he or she may issue the undercover
drivers' licenses in the form and under the conditions he or she
determines to be necessary. The decision of the director regarding
issuance of undercover drivers' licenses is final.
(4) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall keep records pertaining
to undercover drivers' licenses confidential, and such records shall not
be subject to public disclosure. Any person who receives information
pertaining to undercover drivers' licenses in the course of his or her
employment and who discloses any such information to any unauthorized
individual shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.
(5) The contact person shall return the undercover drivers' licenses
to the Department of Motor Vehicles if:
(a) The undercover drivers' licenses expire and are not renewed;
(b) The purpose for which the undercover drivers' licenses were
issued has been completed or terminated;
(c) The persons for whom the undercover drivers' licenses were
issued cease to be employees of the agency; or
(d) The director requests their return.
Sec. 48. Section 81-1021, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1021 (1) All motor vehicles acquired by the State of Nebraska
except any vehicle rented as a bureau fleet vehicle shall be indelibly
and conspicuously lettered, in plain letters of a contrasting color or
reflective material:
(a) On each side thereof with the words State of Nebraska and
-34-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
following such words the name of whatever board, department, bureau,
division, institution, including the University of Nebraska or state
college, office, or other state expending agency of the state to which
the motor vehicle belongs; and
(b) On the back thereof with the words State of Nebraska.
(2) This section shall not apply to motor vehicles used or
controlled by:
(a) The Nebraska State Patrol, the Public Service Commission, the
Game and Parks Commission, deputy state sheriffs employed under the
Livestock Protection Act for state law enforcement purposes, deputy state
sheriffs employed by the Nebraska Brand Committee and State Fire Marshal
for state law enforcement purposes, inspectors employed by the Nebraska
Liquor Control Commission, and persons employed by the Tax Commissioner
for state revenue enforcement purposes, the exemption for state law
enforcement purposes and state revenue enforcement purposes being
confined strictly to the seven agencies specifically named;
(b) The Department of Health and Human Services or the Department of
Correctional Services for the purpose of apprehending and returning
escaped offenders or parole violators to facilities in the Department of
Correctional Services and transporting offenders and personnel of the
Department of Correctional Services and patients and personnel of the
Department of Health and Human Services who are engaged in off-campus
program activities;
(c) The Military Department;
(d) Vocational rehabilitation counselors and the Department of
Health and Human Services for the purposes of communicable disease
control, for the prevention and control of those communicable diseases
which endanger the public health, or used by the Department of Health and
Human Services in the enforcement of drug control laws or for other
investigation purposes;
(e) The Department of Agriculture for special investigative
-35-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
purposes;
(f) The Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing Board for
investigative purposes;
(g) The Insurance Fraud Prevention Division of the Department of
Insurance for investigative purposes; and
(h) The Department of Justice.
Sec. 49. Section 81-1316, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-1316 (1) All agencies and personnel of state government shall be
covered by sections 81-1301 to 81-1319 and shall be considered subject to
the State Personnel System, except the following:
(a) All personnel of the office of the Governor;
(b) All personnel of the office of the Lieutenant Governor;
(c) All personnel of the office of the Secretary of State;
(d) All personnel of the office of the State Treasurer;
(e) All personnel of the office of the Attorney General;
(f) All personnel of the office of the Auditor of Public Accounts;
(g) All personnel of the Legislature;
(h) All personnel of the court systems;
(i) All personnel of the Board of Educational Lands and Funds;
(j) All personnel of the Public Service Commission;
(k) All personnel of the Tax Equalization and Review Commission
Nebraska Brand Committee;
(l) All personnel of the Commission of Industrial Relations;
(m) All personnel of the State Department of Education;
(n) All personnel of the Nebraska state colleges and the Board of
Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges;
(o) All personnel of the University of Nebraska;
(p) All personnel of the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary
Education;
(q) All personnel of the Governor's Policy Research Office;
-36-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
(r) All personnel of the Commission on Public Advocacy;
(s) All agency heads;
(t)(i) The Director of Behavioral Health of the Division of
Behavioral Health; (ii) the Director of Children and Family Services of
the Division of Children and Family Services; (iii) the Director of
Developmental Disabilities of the Division of Developmental Disabilities;
(iv) the Director of Medicaid and Long-Term Care of the Division of
Medicaid and Long-Term Care; and (v) the Director of Public Health of the
Division of Public Health;
(u) The chief medical officer established under section 81-3115, the
Administrator of the Office of Juvenile Services, and the chief executive
officers of the Beatrice State Developmental Center, Lincoln Regional
Center, Norfolk Regional Center, Hastings Regional Center, Central
Nebraska Veterans' Home, Norfolk Veterans' Home, Eastern Nebraska
Veterans' Home, Western Nebraska Veterans' Home, and each youth
rehabilitation and treatment center;
(v) The chief executive officers of all facilities operated by the
Department of Correctional Services and the medical director for the
department appointed pursuant to section 83-4,156;
(w) All personnel employed as pharmacists, physicians,
psychiatrists, or psychologists by the Department of Correctional
Services;
(x) All personnel employed as pharmacists, physicians,
psychiatrists, psychologists, service area administrators, or facility
operating officers of the Department of Health and Human Services or the
Department of Veterans' Affairs;
(y) Deputies and examiners of the Department of Banking and Finance
and the Department of Insurance as set forth in sections 8-105 and
44-119, except for those deputies and examiners who remain in the State
Personnel System;
(z) All personnel of the Tax Equalization and Review Commission;
-37-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
(z) (aa) The associate director of the Conservation Division of the
Nebraska State Historical Society and all personnel employed as a
Conservator I or Conservator II of the Conservation Division of the
Nebraska State Historical Society;
(aa) (bb) Assistant directors and deputies of the Nebraska Public
Employees Retirement Systems; and
(bb) (cc) The Chief Water Officer, assistant directors, and deputies
of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.
(2) At each agency head's discretion, up to the following number of
additional positions may be exempted from the State Personnel System,
based on the following agency size categories:
Number of Agency Number of Noncovered
Employees Positions
less than 25 0
25 to 100 1
101 to 250 2
251 to 500 3
501 to 1000 4
1001 to 2000 5
2001 to 3000 8
3001 to 4000 11
4001 to 5000 40
over 5000 50
The purpose of having such noncovered positions shall be to allow
agency heads the opportunity to recruit, hire, and supervise critical,
confidential, or policymaking personnel without restrictions from
selection procedures, compensation rules, career protections, and
grievance privileges. Persons holding the noncovered positions shall
serve at the pleasure of the agency head and shall be paid salaries set
by the agency head. An agency with over five thousand employees shall
provide notice in writing to the Health and Human Services Committee of
-38-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
the Legislature when forty noncovered positions have been filled by the
agency head pursuant to this subsection.
(3) No changes to this section or to the number of noncovered
positions within an agency shall affect the status of personnel employed
on the date the changes become operative without their prior written
agreement. A state employee's career protections or coverage by personnel
rules and regulations shall not be revoked by redesignation of the
employee's position as a noncovered position without the prior written
agreement of such employee.
Sec. 50. Section 84-1005, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-1005 Subsection (2) of section 84-1001 shall not apply to (1)
employees of the University of Nebraska, the state colleges, the Nebraska
Brand Committee, or the Nebraska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission, (2)
the Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety, his or her
deputies and assistants, members of the Nebraska State Patrol, or carrier
enforcement officers designated under section 60-1303, or (3) the
employees of the Division of Motor Fuels of the office of the Tax
Commissioner who render service on such days and maintain such hours as
the Governor may designate, except that when employees are required to
work on any day designated as a paid holiday, subsections (4) and (5) of
section 84-1001 shall apply.
Sec. 51. Section 84-1411, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
84-1411 (1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section,
each public body shall give reasonable advance publicized notice of the
time and place of each meeting as provided in this subsection. Such
notice shall be transmitted to all members of the public body and to the
public.
(b)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (1)(b)(ii) of this section,
in the case of a public body described in subdivision (1)(a)(i) of
-39-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
section 84-1409 or such body's advisory committees, such notice shall be
given by:
(A)(I) Publication in a newspaper of general circulation within the
public body's jurisdiction that is finalized for printing prior to the
time and date of the meeting, (II) posting on such newspaper's website,
if available, and (III) posting on a statewide website, if available,
established and maintained as a repository for such notices by a majority
of Nebraska newspapers. Such notice shall be placed in the newspaper and
on the websites by the newspaper; or
(B)(I) Posting to the newspaper's website, if available, and (II)
posting to a statewide website, if available, established and maintained
as a repository for such notices by a majority of Nebraska newspapers if
no edition of a newspaper of general circulation within the public body's
jurisdiction is to be finalized for printing prior to the time and date
of the meeting. Such notice shall be placed in the newspaper and on the
websites by the newspaper.
(ii) In the case of the governing body of a city of the second class
or village, any advisory committee of such governing body, or the
governing body of a rural or suburban fire protection district, such
notice shall be given by:
(A)(I) Publication in a newspaper of general circulation within the
public body's jurisdiction that is finalized for printing prior to the
time and date of the meeting, (II) posting on such newspaper's website,
if available, and (III) posting on a statewide website, if available,
established and maintained as a repository for such notices by a majority
of Nebraska newspapers. Such notice shall be placed in the newspaper and
on the websites by the newspaper;
(B)(I) Posting to the newspaper's website, if available, and (II)
posting on a statewide website, if available, established and maintained
as a repository for such notices by a majority of Nebraska newspapers if
no edition of a newspaper of general circulation within the public body's
-40-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
jurisdiction is to be finalized for printing prior to the time and date
of the meeting. Such notice shall be placed in the newspaper and on the
websites by the newspaper; or
(C) Posting written notice in three conspicuous public places in
such city, village, or district. Such notice shall be posted by the
public body in the same three places for each meeting.
(iii) In the case of a public body not described in subdivision (1)
(b)(i) or (ii) of this section, such notice shall be given by a method
designated by the public body.
(iv) In case of refusal, neglect, or inability of the newspaper to
publish the notice, the public body shall (A) post such notice on its
website, if available, (B) request the newspaper submit a post on a
statewide website, if available, established and maintained as a
repository for such notices by a majority of Nebraska newspapers, and (C)
post such notice in a conspicuous public place in such public body's
jurisdiction. The public body shall keep a written record of such posting
pursuant to subdivision (1)(b)(iv)(A) and (C) of this section and a
written record of the request to the newspaper pursuant to subdivision
(1)(b)(iv)(B) of this section. The record of such posting shall be
evidence that such posting was done as required and shall be sufficient
to fulfill the requirement of publication.
(c) In addition to a method of notice required by subdivision (1)(b)
(i) or (ii) of this section, such notice may also be provided by any
other appropriate method designated by such public body or such advisory
committee.
(d) Each public body shall record the methods and dates of such
notice in its minutes.
(e) Such notice shall contain an agenda of subjects known at the
time of the publicized notice or a statement that the agenda, which shall
be kept continually current, shall be readily available for public
inspection at the principal office of the public body during normal
-41-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
business hours. Agenda items shall be sufficiently descriptive to give
the public reasonable notice of the matters to be considered at the
meeting. Except for items of an emergency nature, the agenda shall not be
altered later than (i) twenty-four hours before the scheduled
commencement of the meeting or (ii) forty-eight hours before the
scheduled commencement of a meeting of a city council or village board
scheduled outside the corporate limits of the municipality. The public
body shall have the right to modify the agenda to include items of an
emergency nature only at such public meeting.
(2)(a) The following entities may hold a meeting by means of virtual
conferencing if the requirements of subdivision (2)(b) of this section
are met:
(i) A state agency, state board, state commission, state council, or
state committee, or an advisory committee of any such state entity;
(ii) An organization, including the governing body, created under
the Interlocal Cooperation Act, the Joint Public Agency Act, or the
Municipal Cooperative Financing Act;
(iii) The governing body of a public power district having a
chartered territory of more than one county in this state;
(iv) The governing body of a public power and irrigation district
having a chartered territory of more than one county in this state;
(v) An educational service unit;
(vi) The Educational Service Unit Coordinating Council;
(vii) An organization, including the governing body, of a risk
management pool or its advisory committees organized in accordance with
the Intergovernmental Risk Management Act;
(viii) A community college board of governors;
(ix) The Nebraska Brand Committee;
(ix) (x) A local public health department;
(x) (xi) A metropolitan utilities district;
(xi) (xii) A regional metropolitan transit authority; and
-42-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
(xii) (xiii) A natural resources district.
(b) The requirements for holding a meeting by means of virtual
conferencing are as follows:
(i) Reasonable advance publicized notice is given as provided in
subsection (1) of this section, including providing access to a dial-in
number or link to the virtual conference;
(ii) In addition to the public's right to participate by virtual
conferencing, reasonable arrangements are made to accommodate the
public's right to attend at a physical site and participate as provided
in section 84-1412, including reasonable seating, in at least one
designated site in a building open to the public and identified in the
notice, with: At least one member of the entity holding such meeting, or
his or her designee, present at each site; a recording of the hearing by
audio or visual recording devices; and a reasonable opportunity for
input, such as public comment or questions, is provided to at least the
same extent as would be provided if virtual conferencing was not used;
(iii) At least one copy of all documents being considered at the
meeting is available at any physical site open to the public where
individuals may attend the virtual conference. The public body shall also
provide links to an electronic copy of the agenda, all documents being
considered at the meeting, and the current version of the Open Meetings
Act; and
(iv) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, subsection
(1) of section 70-1014, subsection (2) of section 70-1014.02, or
subsection (4) of section 79-2204, no more than one-half of the meetings
of the state entities, advisory committees, boards, councils,
organizations, or governing bodies are held by virtual conferencing in a
calendar year. In the case of (A) an organization created under the
Interlocal Cooperation Act that sells electricity or natural gas, (B) an
organization created under the Municipal Cooperative Financing Act, (C) a
governing body of a risk management pool and any advisory committee of
-43-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
such governing body, or (D) any advisory committee of any state entity
created in response to the Opioid Prevention and Treatment Act, such
organization, governing body, or committee may hold more than one-half of
its meetings by virtual conferencing if such organization holds at least
one meeting each calendar year that is not by virtual conferencing.
(3) Virtual conferencing, emails, faxes, or other electronic
communication shall not be used to circumvent any of the public
government purposes established in the Open Meetings Act.
(4) The secretary or other designee of each public body shall
maintain a list of the news media requesting notification of meetings and
shall make reasonable efforts to provide advance notification to them of
the time and place of each meeting and the subjects to be discussed at
that meeting.
(5) When it is necessary to hold an emergency meeting without
reasonable advance public notice, the nature of the emergency shall be
stated in the minutes and any formal action taken in such meeting shall
pertain only to the emergency. Such emergency meetings may be held by
virtual conferencing. The provisions of subsection (4) of this section
shall be complied with in conducting emergency meetings. Complete minutes
of such emergency meetings specifying the nature of the emergency and any
formal action taken at the meeting shall be made available to the public
by no later than the end of the next regular business day.
(6) A public body may allow a member of the public or any other
witness to appear before the public body by means of virtual
conferencing.
(7)(a) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (5) of this section, if
an emergency is declared by the Governor pursuant to the Emergency
Management Act as defined in section 81-829.39, a public body the
territorial jurisdiction of which is included in the emergency
declaration, in whole or in part, may hold a meeting by virtual
conferencing during such emergency if the public body gives reasonable
-44-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
advance publicized notice as described in subsection (1) of this section.
The notice shall include information regarding access for the public and
news media. In addition to any formal action taken pertaining to the
emergency, the public body may hold such meeting for the purpose of
briefing, discussion of public business, formation of tentative policy,
or the taking of any action by the public body.
(b) The public body shall provide access by providing a dial-in
number or a link to the virtual conference. The public body shall also
provide links to an electronic copy of the agenda, all documents being
considered at the meeting, and the current version of the Open Meetings
Act. Reasonable arrangements shall be made to accommodate the public's
right to hear and speak at the meeting and record the meeting. Subsection
(4) of this section shall be complied with in conducting such meetings.
(c) The nature of the emergency shall be stated in the minutes.
Complete minutes of such meeting specifying the nature of the emergency
and any formal action taken at the meeting shall be made available for
inspection as provided in subsection (5) of section 84-1413.
(8) In addition to any other statutory authorization for virtual
conferencing, any public body not listed in subdivision (2)(a) of this
section may hold a meeting by virtual conferencing if:
(a) The purpose of the virtual meeting is to discuss items that are
scheduled to be discussed or acted upon at a subsequent non-virtual open
meeting of the public body;
(b) No action is taken by the public body at the virtual meeting;
and
(c) The public body complies with subdivisions (2)(b)(i) and (ii) of
this section.
(9) This section does not apply to a meeting of the Nebraska Power
Review Board or a public power district, a public power and irrigation
district, an electric membership association, an electric cooperative
company, a municipality having a generation and distribution system, or a
-45-

LB1258 LB1258
2026 2026
registered group of municipalities if such meeting is subject to section
70-1034.
Sec. 52. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 53. Original sections 11-201, 54-170, 54-171, 54-171.01,
54-172, 54-176, 54-179, 54-180, 54-182, 54-187.01, 54-193, 54-194,
54-196, 54-197, 54-198, 54-199, 54-1,100, 54-1,101, 54-1,102, 54-1,103,
54-1,104, 54-1,105, 54-1,108, 54-1,115, 54-1,116, 54-1,118, 54-1,124.01,
54-1,125, 54-1,126, 54-1,127, 54-1,128, 54-1,129, 54-1,131, 54-415,
54-1160.01, 60-3,135, 60-480.01, 81-1021, and 84-1005, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 81-1316 and 84-1411, Revised Statutes
Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
Sec. 54. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
54-175, 54-175.01, 54-179.01, 54-179.02, 54-179.03, 54-179.04, 54-186,
54-187.02, 54-188, 54-191, 54-192, 54-195, 54-1,106, 54-1,109, 54-1,110,
54-1,111, 54-1,112, 54-1,113, 54-1,114, 54-1,117, 54-1,119, 54-1,120,
54-1,121, and 54-1,122, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-46-